Indiana, session 2026, HB1409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-42-28-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.235-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) An owner or operator of a mobile retail
food establishment issued a statewide mobile retail food establishment
license is not:
(1) required to obtain a county or local health or safety license
or permit; or
(2) required to pay a county or local health or safety:
(A) inspection fee; or
(B) license or permit fee.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit an
owner or operator of a mobile retail food establishment from
complying with:
(1) the collection and reporting requirements relating to food
or beverage taxes imposed under IC 6-9; or
(2) obtaining applicable municipal business permits or
complying with municipal ordinances or requirements
2026 IN 1409—LS 6827/DI 116


regulating the business operations of mobile retail food
establishments.
SECTION 2. IC 16-42-28-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.235-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a local
health department shall:
(1) receive applications for statewide mobile retail food
establishment licenses;
(2) collect annual license fees and inspection fees authorized
under this chapter and distribute those fees in accordance with
section 5(b) of this chapter;
(3) issue statewide mobile retail food establishment licenses; and
(4) conduct at least semiannual inspections of a mobile retail food
establishment that is issued a statewide mobile retail food
establishment license.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, a person may not operate a mobile
retail food establishment in Indiana unless the person obtains a mobile
retail food establishment license.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1409—LS 6827/DI 116